New York, session 2025-2026, A4526.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1003 of the public authorities law, as amended by 2 chapter 766 of the laws of 2005, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 1003. Trustees. 1. (a) The authority shall consist of seven trus- 4 tees, five of whom shall serve respectively for terms of one, two, 5 three, four and five years, to be appointed by the governor, by and with 6 the advice and consent of the senate. The sixth and seventh trustees 7 shall be appointed by the governor, by and with the advice and consent 8 of the senate, and shall serve initial terms of one and two years 9 respectively. Each trustee shall hold office until a successor has been 10 appointed and qualified. At the expiration of the term of each trustee 11 and of each succeeding trustee the governor shall, by and with the 12 advice and consent of the senate, appoint a successor, who shall hold 13 office for a term of five years, or until a successor has been appointed 14 and qualified. In the event of a vacancy occurring in the office of the 15 trustee by death, resignation or otherwise, the governor shall, by and 16 with the advice and consent of the senate, appoint a successor, who 17 shall hold office for the unexpired term. Four trustees shall constitute 18 a quorum for the purpose of organizing the authority and conducting the 19 business thereof. 20 (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdivi- 21 sion, the first vacancy in an office of trustee occurring after the 22 effective date of this paragraph shall be filled by a resident of 23 Niagara county and thereafter at least one office of trustee shall be 24 held by a resident of Niagara county. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04289-01-5 A. 4526 2 1 2. The trustee chosen as [chairman] chairperson as provided in section 2 one thousand four of this title, shall receive an annual salary which 3 shall be set by the trustees of the authority, and which shall not 4 exceed the salary prescribed for the positions listed in paragraph (f) 5 of subdivision one of section one hundred sixty-nine of the executive 6 law. Each other trustee shall not receive a salary or other compen- 7 sation. Each trustee shall receive [his or her] their reasonable 8 expenses in the performance of [his or her] their duties hereunder. The 9 trustee chosen as [chairman] chairperson may elect to become a member of 10 the New York state and local employees' retirement system on the basis 11 of such compensation to which [he or she] they shall be entitled as 12 herein provided notwithstanding the provisions of any general, special 13 or local law, municipal charter, or ordinance. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.